Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Service System Assessment and Planning

33-2-201. Three-year plan for services and supports — Annual budget request.

The department, on the basis of the statewide planning and policy council's recommendations, shall prepare and maintain on a continuing basis a three-year plan for all mental health services and supports for the state, including services and supports provided or funded by private service providers of all kinds. The department shall revise the plan annually on the basis of its assessment of the public's need for mental health services and supports.

The department shall base its annual budget request to the governor on that part of the three-year plan that the department proposes to be implemented with public funds during the budget year. The department shall report all service objectives and outcomes annually as a part of its three-year plan on which the budget is based.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-2-202. Developmental disabilities planning and policy, mental health planning and policy, and regional planning and policy councils established.

The department shall establish a state developmental disabilities planning and policy council, a state mental health planning and policy council, and regional citizen-based planning and policy councils composed of service recipients, family members of service recipients, service recipient advocates for children, adults, and the elderly, service providers, and other affected persons and organizations for the department's service areas. The councils shall:

Advise the statewide planning and policy council on the three-year plan, including the desirable array of prevention, early intervention, treatment, and habilitation services and supports for service recipients and their families, and such other matters as the commissioner or the statewide planning and policy council may request; and

Provide information and advice to the department on policy, formulation of budget requests, and development and evaluation of services and supports.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-203. Councils — Purpose — Membership.

The councils are to provide citizen participation in policy planning and shall be representative of service recipients and their families, service recipient advocates for children, adults, and the elderly, service providers, agencies, and other affected persons and organizations. At least a majority of each council's membership shall consist of current or former service recipients and members of service recipient families.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.